Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,187
Act, how construed; indemnification.

The Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act shall not be construed as an acceptance of liability by the State of Nebraska for activities conducted pursuant to such act. Entities proceeding under such act shall indemnify and hold harmless the State of Nebraska for any further action required by the federal Environmental Protection Agency relating to land pollution or water pollution by an entity.

Laws 1994, LB 1349, § 7.